Washington statutes.
RCW 35.104.100

Dissolution of sponsoring local government.

The board may petition the sponsoring local government to be dissolved upon a showing that it has no reason to exist and that any assets it retains must be returned to the state treasurer.

[ 2007 c 251 s 10.]

NOTES:

Captions not law—Severability—2007 c 251: See notes following RCW 35.104.010.